Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska47-622
Community Corrections Division; created.

The
Legislature declares that the policy of the State of Nebraska is that there
shall be a coordinated effort to (1) establish community correctional programs
across the state in order to divert adult felony offenders from the prison
system and (2) provide necessary supervision and services to adult felony
offenders with the goal of reducing the probability of criminal behavior while
maintaining public safety. To further such policy, the Community Corrections Division is created within the Nebraska Commission on Law Enforcement
and Criminal Justice. The director
shall appoint and remove employees of the division and delegate appropriate
powers and duties to such employees.

Laws 2003, LB 46, § 34;

Laws 2005, LB 538, § 13;

Laws 2011, LB390, § 7.